Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6926
Refunds; interest not allowable.

Interest shall not be allowable on any refunds paid because of benefits earned under the Urban Redevelopment Act.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 26.